Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1320
Permanent state employees; sick leave; schedule.

Permanent employees of the State of Nebraska shall be entitled to sick leave with full pay computed at the rate of eight work hours per month for each calendar month of service. Those employees who have completed five or more years of service shall be entitled to one hundred thirty-six hours of sick leave during their sixth year of employment and shall thereafter be entitled to an additional eight hours of sick leave for each year of service not to exceed two hundred forty hours per calendar year. Sick leave shall be earned in accordance with the following schedule:

During 1st year of continuous employment ......... 96 hours per year

During 2nd year of continuous employment ......... 96 hours per year

During 3rd year of continuous employment ......... 96 hours per year

During 4th year of continuous employment ......... 96 hours per year

During 5th year of continuous employment ......... 96 hours per year

During 6th year of continuous employment ......... 136 hours per year

During 7th year of continuous employment ......... 144 hours per year

During 8th year of continuous employment ......... 152 hours per year

During 9th year of continuous employment ......... 160 hours per year

During 10th year of continuous employment ........ 168 hours per year

During 11th year of continuous employment ........ 176 hours per year

During 12th year of continuous employment ........ 184 hours per year

During 13th year of continuous employment ........ 192 hours per year

During 14th year of continuous employment ........ 200 hours per year

During 15th year of continuous employment ........ 208 hours per year

During 16th year of continuous employment ........ 216 hours per year

During 17th year of continuous employment ........ 224 hours per year

During 18th year of continuous employment ........ 232 hours per year

During 19th year of continuous employment and thereafter .... 240 hours per year; Provided, that employees who are regularly employed less than forty hours a week shall be entitled to sick leave proportionate to their regular workweek; and provided further, that any employee who has been employed by the Legislature or Legislative Council shall, for sick leave entitlement purposes, be credited with one continuous year of employment for each two hundred sixty working days such employee was employed by the Legislature or Legislative Council.

Laws 1973, LB 340, § 1.